Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-443
Delivery of drug paraphernalia to a minor; penalty.

Any person eighteen years of age or older who violates section 28-442 by delivering drug paraphernalia to a person under eighteen years of age who is at least three years his or her junior shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1980, LB 991, § 5.